inc/flattened/createYaml/yaml_output/VTI_IND_TI4.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0SgO: indayaasiinaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: gidayaasiinaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0SgO: indayaasiiminaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0SgO: gidayaasiiminaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: gidayaasiinaawaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO: odayaasiinaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO: odayaasiinaawaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO: odayaasiininaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+0PlO: indayaasiinaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+0PlO: gidayaasiinaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+0PlO: indayaasiiminaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+0PlO: gidayaasiiminaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+0PlO: gidayaasiinaawaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+0PlO: odayaasiinaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+0PlO: odayaasiinaawaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+0PlO: odayaasiininaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0SgO: indayaanaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0SgO: gidayaanaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0SgO: indayaaminaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0SgO: gidayaaminaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0SgO: gidayaanaawaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0SgO: odayaanaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0SgO: odayaanaawaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+0SgO: odayaaninaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+0SgO: odayaaninaadog
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+0PlO: indayaanaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+0PlO: gidayaanaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+0PlO: indayaaminaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+0PlO: gidayaaminaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+0PlO: gidayaanaawaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+0PlO: odayaanaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+0PlO: odayaanaawaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+0PlO: odayaaninaadogenan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0SgO: indayaasiin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0SgO: gidayaasiin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0SgO: indayaasiimin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0SgO: gidayaasiimin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0SgO: gidayaasiinaawaa
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO: odayaasiin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO: odayaasiinaawaa
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+0PlO: indayaasiinan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+0PlO: gidayaasiinan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+0PlO: indayaasiimin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+0PlO: gidayaasiimin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+0PlO: gidayaasiinaawaan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+0PlO: odayaasiinan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+0PlO: odayaasiinaawaan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0SgO: indayaan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0SgO: gidayaan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0SgO: indayaamin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0SgO: gidayaamin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0SgO: gidayaanaawaa
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0SgO: odayaan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0SgO: odayaanaawaa
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+0PlO: indayaanan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+0PlO: gidayaanan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+0PlO: indayaamin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+0PlO: gidayaamin
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+0PlO: gidayaanaawaan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+0PlO: odayaanan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+0PlO: odayaanaawaan
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0SgO: indayaasiinaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: gidayaasiinaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0SgO: indayaasiiminaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0SgO: gidayaasiiminaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: gidayaasiinaawaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO: odayaasiinaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO: odayaasiinaawaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO: odayaasiininaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0PlO: [indayaasiinaabaniin,indayaasiinaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0PlO: [gidayaasiinaabaniin,gidayaasiinaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0PlO: [indayaasiiminaabaniin,indayaasiiminaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0PlO: [gidayaasiiminaabaniin,gidayaasiiminaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0PlO: [gidayaasiinaawaabaniin,gidayaasiinaawaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0PlO: [odayaasiinaabaniin,odayaasiinaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0PlO: [odayaasiinaawaabaniin,odayaasiinaawaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0PlO: [odayaasiininaabaniin,odayaasiininaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0SgO: indayaasiinaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: gidayaasiinaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0SgO: indayaasiiminaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0SgO: gidayaasiiminaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: gidayaasiinaawaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO: odayaasiinaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO: odayaasiinaawaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO: odayaasiininaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+0PlO: [indayaasiinaabaniin,indayaasiinaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+0PlO: [gidayaasiinaabaniin,gidayaasiinaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+0PlO: [indayaasiiminaabaniin,indayaasiiminaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+0PlO: [gidayaasiiminaabaniin,gidayaasiiminaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+0PlO: [gidayaasiinaawaabaniin,gidayaasiinaawaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+0PlO: [odayaasiinaabaniin,odayaasiinaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+0PlO: [odayaasiinaawaabaniin,odayaasiinaawaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+0PlO: [odayaasiininaabaniin,odayaasiininaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0SgO: indayaanaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0SgO: gidayaanaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0SgO: indayaaminaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0SgO: gidayaaminaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0SgO: gidayaanaawaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO: odayaanaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO: odayaanaawaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+0PlO: [indayaanaabaniin,indayaanaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+0PlO: [gidayaanaabaniin,gidayaanaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+0PlO: [indayaaminaabaniin,indayaaminaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+0PlO: [gidayaaminaabaniin,gidayaaminaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+0PlO: [gidayaanaawaabaniin,gidayaanaawaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+0PlO: [odayaanaabaniin,odayaanaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+0PlO: [odayaanaawaabaniin,odayaanaawaabanen]
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: ayaanziigoban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: ayaanziigwaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: ayaanziinigoban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx+0SgO/0PlO: ayaamogoban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx+0SgO/0PlO: ayaamogwaaban
     ayaan+VTI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv+0SgO/0PlO: ayaaminigoban
